Arkansas, session 2025, SB537.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. DO NOT CODIFY. Title.
This act shall be known and may be cited as the "Earning Safe Reentry
Through Work Act".

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code Title 16, Chapter 93, Subchapter 1, is
amended to add an additional section to read as follows:
16-93-112. Earning Safe Reentry Through Work Act.
(a) As used in this section:
(1) "Eligible employment" means any occupation or combination of
occupations for which a supervised offender can provide documentation of
verifiable wage-earning hours in the amount of at least one hundred and
*CEB256*
04-01-2025 11:11:44 CEB256

As Engrossed: S4/1/25 SB537
thirty (130) hours per thirty-day period;
(2) "Supervised offender" means an individual on probation,
parole, or post-release supervision under the supervision of the Division of
Community Correction;
(3) "Supporting documentation" means an employment record, pay
stub, employment letter, contract, or other similarly reliable method of
employment verification, as determined by the Division of Community
Correction;
(4) "Work-for-time credit" means a credit that is equal to a one
(1) day reduction in a supervised offender's sentence that can be accrued for
maintaining eligible employment; and
(5) "Working days" means a business day that does not include
Saturday, Sunday, or a state or federal holiday.
(b) For offenses committed on or after the effective date of this
section, each supervised offender who maintains eligible employment shall
accrue work-for-time credits under the following conditions:
(1) The supervised offender shall provide supporting
documentation of eligible employment to the community supervision officer
responsible for the supervised offender's supervision at each meeting with
his or her community supervision officer;
(2)(A) The community supervision officer shall verify the
supervised offender’s eligible employment through the supervised offender’s
supporting documentation and any other means that the division determines
necessary.
(B) The community supervision officer shall enter the
supporting documentation into and record the supervised offender’s accrual of
all work-for-time credits in the supervised offender's file within five (5)
working days of verifying the supervised offender’s eligible employment;
(3) A supervised offender, including a person who is being
supervised in another state, shall accrue five (5) work-for-time credits for
every thirty-day-period in which the offender maintains eligible employment,
except for the sixty-day-period immediately prior to the supervised
offender’s adjusted sentence end date during which no work-for-time credits
shall accrue;
(4) If the supervised offender's probation, parole, or post-
release supervision is revoked or if the supervised offender is convicted of
04-01-2025 11:11:44 CEB256

As Engrossed: S4/1/25 SB537
a new criminal offense or if the supervised offender provides fraudulent
employment documents, the supervised offender forfeits all previously accrued
work-for-time credits; and
(5)(A) A supervised offender shall not receive a work-for-time
credit if the offender’s supporting documentation is unverifiable,
inaccurate, or absent from his or her file.
(B) If a request for a work-for-time credit is denied, the
community supervision officer shall record the reason for the denial of the
work-for-time credit in the supervised offender's file.
(c) There is no right to appeal the denial or forfeiture of work-for-
time credits under this section.
(d) The community supervision officer responsible for supervising a
supervised offender who accrues work-for-time credits shall notify the
sentencing court of the supervised offender’s accrual of work-for-time
credits no less than sixty (60) days in advance of the supervised offender’s
adjusted sentence end date, which includes the accrual of work-for-time
credits up to the date of the notification.

SECTION 4. EMERGENCY CLAUSE. It is found and determined by the
General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that recidivism threatens the
safety of the state; that incentivizing a person on probation, parole, and
post-release supervision will reduce the risk of recidivism; and that this
act is immediately necessary to reduce the risk of recidivism and provide for
the efficient and effective allocation of supervision services. Therefore, an
emergency is declared to exist, and this act being immediately necessary for
the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become
effective on:
(1) The date of its approval by the Governor;
(2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor,
the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the
bill; or
(3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is
overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.

/s/Gilmore

04-01-2025 11:11:44 CEB256